Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-8230
Specialty level burn or pediatric trauma center, defined.

Specialty level burn or pediatric trauma center means a trauma center that provides specialized care in the areas of burns or pediatrics.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 30;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 95;

Laws 2015, LB46, § 8;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 103.